Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Chapter 11

Uniform Relocation Assistance Act of 1972

13-11-101. Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Relocation Assistance Act of 1972.”

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-1901.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of Uniform Relocation Assistance Act, OAG 99-135, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 173 (7/7/99).

13-11-102. Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish a uniform policy for the fair and equitable treatment of persons displaced as a direct result of programs or projects undertaken by state agencies with or without federal financial assistance, programs or projects undertaken by local agencies with federal or state financial assistance and programs or projects undertaken by persons with federal financial assistance, in order that such displaced persons shall not suffer disproportionate injuries as a result of federal or state programs or projects designed for the benefit of the public as a whole, and to minimize the hardship of displacement on such persons.

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 2; T.C.A., § 13-1902; Acts 1988, ch. 627, § 1.

13-11-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Business” means any lawful activity, excepting a farm operation, conducted primarily:

For the purchase, sale, lease and rental of personal and real property, and for the manufacture, processing, or marketing of products, commodities, or any other personal property;

For the sale of services to the public;

By a nonprofit organization; or

Solely for the purposes of § 13-11-105, for assisting in the purchase, sale, resale, manufacture, processing, or marketing of products, commodities, personal property, or services by the erection and maintenance of an outdoor advertising display or displays, whether or not such display or displays are located on the premises on which any of the above activities are conducted;

“Comparable replacement dwelling” means any dwelling that is:

Decent, safe, and sanitary;

Adequate in size to accommodate the occupants;

Within the financial means of the displaced person;

Functionally equivalent to the dwelling from which the occupant was displaced;

In an area not subject to unreasonable adverse environmental conditions; and

In a location generally not less desirable than the location of the displaced person's dwelling with respect to public utilities, facilities, services, and the displaced person's place of employment;

“Displaced person” means, except as provided in subdivision (2)(B):

Any person who moves from real property, or moves such person's personal property from real property:

As a direct result of a written notice of intent to acquire or the acquisition of such real property in whole or in part for a program or project undertaken by a state agency or with federal financial assistance; or

On which such person is a residential tenant or conducts a small business, a farm operation, or a business defined in subdivision (1)(D), as a direct result of rehabilitation, demolition, or such other displacing activity as the governor or the governor's designee may prescribe, under a program or project undertaken by a state agency or with federal financial assistance in any case in which the head of the displacing agency determines that such displacement is permanent; and

Solely for the purposes of §§ 13-11-105(a) and (b) and 13-11-108, any person who moves from real property, or moves such person's personal property from real property as a direct result of a written notice of intent to acquire or the acquisition of other real property, in whole or in part, on which such person conducts a business or farm operation, for a program or project undertaken by a state agency or with federal financial assistance; or as a direct result of rehabilitation, demolition, or such other displacing activity as the governor or the governor's designee may prescribe, of other real property on which such person conducts a business or a farm operation, under a program or project undertaken by a state agency or with federal financial assistance where the head of the displacing agency determines that such displacement is permanent;

“Displaced person” does not include:

A person who has been determined, according to criteria established by the governor or the governor's designee, to be either in unlawful occupancy of the displacement dwelling or to have occupied such dwelling for the purpose of obtaining assistance under this chapter; or

In any case in which the displacing agency acquires property for a program or project, any person, other than a person who was an occupant of such property at the time it was acquired, who occupies such property on a rental basis for a short term or a period subject to termination when the property is needed for the program or project;

“Displacing agency” means any state agency undertaking a program or project with or without federal financial assistance, which causes a person to be displaced, a local agency undertaking a program or project with federal or state financial assistance, which causes a person to be displaced, or a person undertaking a program or project with federal financial assistance, which causes a person to be displaced;

“Farm operation” means any activity conducted solely or primarily for the production of one (1) or more agricultural products or commodities, including timber, for sale or home use, and customarily producing such products or commodities in sufficient quantity to be capable of contributing materially to the operator's support;

“Local agency” means any political subdivision of the state or any department, agency, or instrumentality of a political subdivision of the state or any department, agency, or instrumentality of two (2) or more political subdivisions of the state when carrying out or undertaking programs or projects with federal or state financial assistance;

“Mortgage” means such classes of liens as are commonly given to secure advances on or the unpaid purchase price of, real property, under the laws of this state, together with the credit instruments, if any, secured thereby;

“Person” means and includes, but is not limited to, a partnership, company, corporation, association, individual, or family who is undertaking programs or projects with federal financial assistance, or such other person, business or farm operation which is entitled to any financial or other benefit as a result of federal financial assistance, or the undertaking of any program or project by a state agency;

“State agency” means any department, agency, or instrumentality of the state when carrying out or undertaking programs or projects with or without federal financial assistance, or when providing state financial assistance; and

“State financial assistance” means a grant, loan, or contribution provided by the state, except any state guarantee or insurance, any interest reduction payment to an individual in connection with the purchase and occupancy of a residence by that individual, and any annual payment or capital loan to the state.

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 3; T.C.A., § 13-1903; Acts 1985, ch. 264, § 1; 1988, ch. 627, § 2.

13-11-104. Effect upon property acquisition.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as creating in any condemnation proceedings brought under the power of eminent domain, any element of value or of damage not in existence immediately prior to March 30, 1972.

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 4; T.C.A., § 13-1904.

13-11-105. Moving and related expenses.

Whenever a program or project to be undertaken by a displacing agency will result in the displacement of any person, the head of the displacing agency shall provide for the payment to the displaced person of:

Actual reasonable expenses in moving such person, such person's family, business, farm operation, or other personal property;

Actual direct losses of tangible personal property as a result of moving or discontinuing a business or farm operation, but not to exceed an amount equal to the reasonable expenses that would have been required to relocate such property, as determined by the head of the displacing agency;

Actual reasonable expenses in searching for a replacement business or farm; and

Actual reasonable expenses necessary to reestablish a displaced farm, nonprofit organization, or small business at its new site, but not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

Any displaced person eligible for payments under subsection (a) who is displaced from a dwelling and who elects to accept the payments authorized by this subsection (b) in lieu of the payments authorized by subsection (a) may receive an expense and dislocation allowance, which shall be determined according to a schedule established by the governor or the governor's designee.

Any displaced person eligible for payments under subsection (a) who is displaced from the person's place of business or farm operation and who is eligible under criteria established by the governor or the governor's designee may elect to accept the payment authorized by this subsection (c) in lieu of the payment authorized by subsection (a). Such payment shall consist of a fixed payment in an amount to be determined according to criteria established by the governor or the governor's designee, except that such payment shall not be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). A person whose sole business at the displacement dwelling is the rental of such property to others shall not qualify for a payment under this subsection (c).

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 5; T.C.A., § 13-1905; Acts 1988, ch. 627, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds absent appropriation.

13-11-106. Replacement housing for homeowners.

In addition to payments otherwise authorized by this chapter, the head of the displacing agency shall make an additional payment not in excess of twenty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($22,500) to any displaced person who is displaced from a dwelling actually owned and occupied by such displaced person for not less than one hundred eighty (180) days prior to the initiation of negotiations for the acquisition of the property. Such additional payment shall include the following elements:

The amount, if any, which, when added to the acquisition cost of the dwelling acquired by the displacing agency, equals the reasonable cost of a comparable replacement dwelling;

The amount, if any, which will compensate such displaced person for any increased interest costs and other debt service costs which such person is required to pay for financing the acquisition of any such comparable replacement dwelling. Such amount shall be paid only if the dwelling acquired by the displacing agency was encumbered by a bona fide mortgage which was a valid lien on such dwelling for not less than one hundred eighty (180) days immediately prior to the initiation of negotiations for the acquisition of such dwelling; and

Reasonable expenses incurred by such displaced person for evidence of title, recording fees, and other closing costs incident to the purchase of the replacement dwelling, but not including prepaid expenses.

The additional payment authorized by subsection (a) shall be made only to a displaced person who purchases and occupies a decent, safe, and sanitary replacement dwelling within one (1) year after the date on which such person receives final payment from the displacing agency for the acquired dwelling or the date on which the displacing agency's obligation under § 13-11-108(c)(3) is met, whichever is later, except that the displacing agency may extend such period for good cause. If such period is extended, the payment under subsection (a) shall be based on the costs of relocating the person to a comparable replacement dwelling within one (1) year of such date.

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 6; T.C.A., § 13-1906; Acts 1988, ch. 627, § 4.

13-11-107. Replacement housing for tenants and certain others.

In addition to amounts otherwise authorized by this chapter, the head of a displacing agency shall make a payment to or for any displaced person displaced from any dwelling not eligible to receive a payment under § 13-11-106, which dwelling was actually and lawfully occupied by such displaced person for not less than ninety (90) days immediately prior to:

The initiation of negotiations for acquisition of such dwelling; or

In any case in which displacement is not a direct result of acquisition, such other event as the governor or the governor's designee shall prescribe.

Such payment shall consist of the amount necessary to enable such person to lease or rent for a period not to exceed forty-two (42) months, a comparable replacement dwelling, but not to exceed five thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($5,250). At the discretion of the head of the displacing agency, a payment under this subsection (a) may be made in periodic installments. Computation of a payment under this subsection (a) to a low income displaced person for a comparable replacement dwelling shall take into account such person's income.

Any person eligible for a payment under subsection (a) may elect to apply such payment to a down payment on, and other incidental expenses pursuant to, the purchase of a decent, safe, and sanitary replacement dwelling. Any such person may, at the discretion of the head of the displacing agency, be eligible under this subsection (b) for the maximum payment allowed under subsection (a), except that, in the case of a displaced homeowner who has owned and occupied the displacement dwelling for at least ninety (90) days but not more than one hundred eighty (180) days immediately prior to the initiation of negotiations for the acquisition of such dwelling, such payment shall not exceed the payment such person would otherwise have received under § 13-11-106(a), had the person owned and occupied the displacement dwelling one hundred eighty (180) days immediately prior to the initiation of such negotiations.

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 7; T.C.A., § 13-1907; Acts 1988, ch. 627, § 5.

13-11-108. Relocation assistance advisory services.

Programs or projects undertaken by a state agency or with federal financial assistance shall be planned in a manner that:

Recognizes, at an early stage in the planning of such programs or projects and before the commencement of any actions which will cause displacements, the problems associated with the displacement of individuals, families, businesses, and farm operations; and

Provides for the resolution of such problems in order to minimize adverse impacts on displaced persons and to expedite program or project advancement and completion.

The head of any displacing agency shall ensure that the relocation assistance advisory services described in subsection (c) are made available to all persons displaced by such agency. If such agency head determines that any person occupying property immediately adjacent to the property where the displacing activity occurs is caused substantial economic injury as a result thereof, the agency head may make available to such person such advisory services.

Each relocation assistance advisory program required by subsection (b) shall include such measures, facilities, or services as may be necessary or appropriate in order to:

Determine, and make timely recommendations on, the needs and preferences, if any, of displaced persons for relocation assistance;

Provide current and continuing information on the availability, sales prices, and rental charges of comparable replacement dwellings for displaced homeowners and tenants and suitable locations for businesses and farm operations;

Assure that a person shall not be required to move from a dwelling unless the person has had a reasonable opportunity to relocate to a comparable replacement dwelling, except in the case of:

A major disaster as defined in § 102(2) of the Federal Disaster Relief Act of 1974 (42 U.S.C. § 5122(2));

A national emergency declared by the president; or

Any other emergency which requires the person to move immediately from the dwelling because continued occupancy of such dwelling by such person constitutes a substantial danger to the health or safety of such person;

Assist a person displaced from a business or farm operation in obtaining and becoming established in a suitable replacement location;

Supply information concerning other federal and state programs which may be of assistance to displaced persons, and supply technical assistance to such persons in applying for assistance under such programs; and

Provide other advisory services to displaced persons in order to minimize hardships to such persons in adjusting to relocation.

The head of a displacing agency shall coordinate the relocation activities performed by such agency with other federal, state, or local governmental actions in the community which could affect the efficient and effective delivery of relocation assistance and related services.

Notwithstanding § 13-11-103(3), in any case in which a displacing agency acquires property for a program or project, any person who occupies such property on a rental basis for a short term or a period subject to termination when the property is needed for the program or project shall be eligible for advisory services to the extent determined by the displacing agency.

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 8; T.C.A., § 13-1908; Acts 1988, ch. 627, § 6.

13-11-109. Housing replacement by state agency as last resort.

If a program or project undertaken by a state agency or with federal financial assistance cannot proceed on a timely basis because comparable replacement dwellings are not available, and the head of the displacing agency determines that such dwellings cannot otherwise be made available, the head of the displacing agency may take such action as is necessary or appropriate to provide such dwellings by use of funds authorized for such program or project. The head of the displacing agency may use this section to exceed the maximum amounts which may be paid under §§ 13-11-106 and 13-11-107, on a case-by-case basis for good cause as determined in accordance with such criteria as the governor or the governor's designee shall prescribe.

No person shall be required to move from such person's dwelling on account of any program or project undertaken by a state agency or with federal financial assistance, unless the head of the displacing agency is satisfied that comparable replacement housing is available to such person.

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 9; T.C.A., § 13-1909; Acts 1988, ch. 627, § 7.

13-11-110. Requirements for relocation payments and assistance of state assisted programs — Assurances of availability of housing.

Notwithstanding any other law, the head of a state agency shall not approve any grant to, or contract or agreement with, a local agency under which state financial assistance will be available to pay all or part of the cost of any program or project which will result in the displacement of any person on or after March 30, 1972, unless such head of a state agency receives satisfactory assurances from such local agency that:

Fair and reasonable relocation payments and assistance shall be provided to or for displaced persons, as are required to be provided by a state agency under §§ 13-11-105 — 13-11-107;

Relocation assistance programs offering the services described in § 13-11-108 shall be provided to such displaced persons; and

There is compliance with §§ 13-11-108(c)(3) and 13-11-109.

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 10; T.C.A., § 13-1910; Acts 1988, ch. 627, § 8.

13-11-111. Permissive authority given local agency.

Whenever a program or project undertaken by a local agency or person requires the acquisition of real property or the displacement of any person, the head of the local agency, or the person, shall have permissive authority to provide payments and assistance under this chapter for any displaced person, including replacement housing when necessary, as if the acquisition or displacement were for a program or project undertaken by a state agency.

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 11; T.C.A., § 13-1911; Acts 1988, ch. 627, § 9.

13-11-112. State share of costs.

The cost to a local agency of providing payments and assistance under §§ 13-11-109 and 13-11-110 shall be included as part of the cost of a program or project for which state financial assistance is available to such local agency, and such local agency shall be eligible for state financial assistance with respect to such payments and assistance in the same manner and to the same extent as other program or project costs.

No payment or assistance under § 13-11-109 or § 13-11-110 shall be required or included as a program or project cost under this section if the displaced person receives a payment required by the state law of eminent domain which is determined by the head of the state agency to have substantially the same purpose and effect.

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 12; T.C.A., § 13-1912; Acts 1988, ch. 627, § 10.

13-11-113. Authority of the governor.

The governor or the governor's designee, or the head of a local agency, where a local agency undertakes a program or project without federal financial assistance and uses its permissive authority under § 13-11-111, shall establish criteria necessary to assure that:

The payments and assistance authorized by this chapter shall be administered in a manner which is fair and equitable, and as uniform as practicable;

A displaced person who is entitled to the benefits of this chapter shall be paid promptly after proof of a move or, in hardship cases, be paid in advance; and

Any displaced person aggrieved by a determination as to eligibility for a payment authorized by this chapter, or the amount of a payment, may have such displaced person's application reviewed by the head of the state agency, or where the determination is made by a local agency, such displaced person may have the application reviewed by the head of the local agency.

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 13; T.C.A., § 13-1913; Acts 1988, ch. 627, § 11.

13-11-114. Administration — Relocation assistance programs.

To prevent unnecessary expense and duplication of functions, and to promote uniform and effective administration of this chapter, a state agency, applicable local agency, or applicable person may enter into contracts with any individual, firm, or corporation for services in connection with a program or project, or may carry out all functions provided for under this chapter through any federal agency or any state agency, or any local agency, or any person having an established organization for conducting this chapter.

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 14; T.C.A., § 13-1914; Acts 1988, ch. 627, § 12.

13-11-115. Payments not to be considered as income or resources.

No payment received by a displaced person under this chapter shall be considered as income or resources for the purposes of determining the eligibility or extent of eligibility of any person for assistance under any state law or for the purposes of the state's corporation tax law, or other tax laws.

These payments shall not be considered as income or resources of any recipient of public assistance and the payments shall not be deducted from the amount of aid to which the recipient would be entitled.

No payments under this chapter shall be subject to attachment or execution at law or equity.

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 15; T.C.A., § 13-1915.

13-11-116. Replacement by building code enforcement or voluntary rehabilitation.

A person who moves or discontinues such person's business or moves other personal property, or moves from such person's dwelling on or after March 30, 1972, as the direct result of building code enforcement activities or a program of rehabilitation of buildings conducted pursuant to a state project or program shall, for the purposes of this chapter, be deemed to have been displaced as the result of the acquisition of real property.

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 16; T.C.A., § 13-1916.

13-11-117. Reduction in payments.

No payment or assistance provided for under this chapter shall be required to be made to any displaced person, or included as a program or project cost under this chapter, if such displaced person receives a payment required by federal, state, or local law, which is determined by the head of the displacing agency to have substantially the same purpose or effect as such payment under this chapter.

Acts 1972, ch. 608, § 17; T.C.A., § 13-1917; Acts 1988, ch. 627, § 13.

13-11-118. Uneconomic remnant — Donation of property.

If the acquisition of only a portion of a property being acquired for a program or project with federal financial assistance would leave the owner with an uneconomic remnant, the state agency, local agency, or person concerned shall offer to acquire that remnant. For the purposes of this chapter, an uneconomic remnant is a parcel of real property in which the owner is left with an interest after the partial acquisition of the owner's property, and which the head of the displacing agency concerned has determined has little or no value or utility to the owner.

A person whose real property is being acquired for a program or project with federal financial assistance, may, after the person has been fully informed of the person's right to receive just compensation for such property, donate such property, any part thereof, any interest therein, or any compensation paid therefor, to a state agency, local agency, or person, as such person who owns the real property shall determine.

Acts 1988, ch. 627, § 14.

13-11-119. State as federal agent.

A state agency shall be authorized to act as the agent of a federal agency to carry out the federal agency's responsibilities under federal law which are consistent with this chapter.

Acts 1988, ch. 627, § 15.